North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Part 2. The Oil and Gas Conservation Act.
§ 113-393.
Development of lands as drilling unit by agreement or order of Commission.

Integration of Interests and Shares in Drilling Unit. — When two or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within an established drilling unit, the owners thereof may agree validly to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. Where, however, such owners have not agreed to integrate their interests, the Commission shall, for the prevention of waste or to avoid drilling of unnecessary wells, require such owners to do so and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. All orders requiring such integration shall be made after notice and hearing, and shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable, and will afford to the owner of each tract the opportunity to recover or receive his just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool without unnecessary expense, and will prevent or minimize reasonably avoidable drainage from each developed unit which is not equalized by counter-drainage. The portion of the production allocated to the owner of each tract included in a drilling unit formed by an integration order shall, when produced, be considered as if it had been produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon.In the event such integration is required, and provided also that after due notice to all the owners of tracts within such drilling unit of the creation of such drilling unit, and provided further that the Commission has received no protest thereto, or request for hearing thereon, whether or not 10 days have elapsed after notice has been given of the creation of the drilling unit, the operator designated by the Commission to develop and operate the integrated unit shall have the right to charge to each other interested owner the actual expenditures required for such purpose not in excess of what are reasonable, including a reasonable charge for supervision, and the operator shall have the right to receive the first production from the well drilled by him thereon, which otherwise would be delivered or paid to the other parties jointly interested in the drilling of the well, so that the amount due by each of them for his shares of the expense of drilling, equipping, and operating the well may be paid to the operator of the well out of production; with the value of the production calculated at the market price in the field at the time such production is received by the operator or placed to his credit. After being reimbursed for the actual expenditures for drilling and equipping and operating expenses incurred during the drilling operations and until the operator is reimbursed, the operator shall thereafter pay to the owner of each tract within the pool his ratable share of the production calculated at the market price in the field at the time of such production less the reasonable expense of operating the well. In the event of any dispute relative to such costs, the Commission shall determine the proper costs.

When Each Owner May Drill. — Should the owners of separate tracts embraced within a drilling unit fail to agree upon the integration of the tracts and the drilling of a well on the unit, and should it be established that the Commission is without authority to require integration as provided for in subsection (a) of this section, then, subject to all other applicable provisions of this law, the owner of each tract embraced within the drilling unit may drill on his tract, but the allowable production from each tract shall be such proportion of the allowable for the full drilling unit as the area of such separately owned tract bears to the full drilling unit.

Cooperative Development Not in Restraint of Trade. — Agreements made in the interests of conservation of oil or gas, or both, or for the prevention of waste, between and among owners or operators, or both, owning separate holdings in the same oil or gas pool, or in any area that appears from geological or other data to be underlaid by a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both, or between and among such owners or operators, or both, and royalty owners therein, of a pool or area, or any part thereof, as a unit for establishing and carrying out a plan for the cooperative development and operation thereof, when such agreements are approved by the Commission, are hereby authorized and shall not be held or construed to violate any of the statutes of this State relating to trusts, monopolies, or contracts and combinations in restraining of trade.

Variation from Vertical. — Whenever the Department fixes the location of any well or wells on the surface, the point at which the maximum penetration of such wells into the producing formation is reached shall not unreasonably vary from the vertical drawn from the center of the hole at the surface, provided, that the Commission shall prescribe rules and the Department shall prescribe orders governing the reasonableness of such variation. This subsection shall not apply to wells drilled for the purpose of exploration or development of natural gas through use of horizontal drilling in conjunction with hydraulic fracturing treatments.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 13; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 112; 2012-143, s. 3(a).

§ 113-394.
Limitations on production; allocating and prorating “allowables.”

The Commission may limit the total amount of oil, including condensate, which may be produced in the State by fixing an amount which shall be designated “allowable” for the State. The Commission may then allocate or distribute the “allowable” for the State among the pools on a reasonable basis and in such manner as to avoid undue discrimination, and so that waste will be prevented. In allocating the “allowable” for the State, and in fixing “allowables” for pools producing oil or hydrocarbons forming condensate, or both oil and such hydrocarbons, the Commission may take into account the producing conditions and other relevant facts with respect to such pools, including the separate needs for oil, gas and condensate, and may formulate rules setting forth standards or a program for the distribution of the “allowable” for the State, and distribute the “allowable” for the State in accordance with such standards or program, and where conditions in one pool or area are substantially similar to those in another pool or area, then the same standards or programs shall be applied to such pools and areas so that as far as practicable a uniform program will be followed; provided, however, the Commission shall allow the production of a sufficient amount of natural gas from any pool to supply adequately the reasonable market demand for such gas for light and fuel purposes if such production can be obtained without waste, and the condensate “allowable” for such pool shall not be less than the total amount of condensate produced or obtained in connection with the production of the gas “allowable” for light and fuel purposes, and provided further that, if the amount allocated to pool as its share of the “allowable” for the State is in excess of the amount which the pool should produce to prevent waste, then the Commission shall fix the “allowable” for the pool so that waste will be prevented.In allocating “allowables” to pools, the Commission shall not be bound by nominations or desires of purchasers to purchase oil from particular fields or areas, and the Commission shall allocate the “allowable” for the State in such manner as will prevent undue discrimination against any pool or area in favor of another or others which would result from selective buying or nominating by purchasers of oil, as such term “selective buying or nominating” is understood in the oil business.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-365, s. 4, effective July 29, 2013.

Whenever the Commission limits the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in any pool in this State to an amount less than that which the pool could produce if no restrictions were imposed (which limitation may be imposed either incidental to, or without, a limitation of the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in the State), the Commission shall prorate or distribute the “allowable” production among the producers in the pool on a reasonable basis, and so that each producer will have the opportunity to produce or receive his just and equitable share, as such share is set forth in subsection G.S. 113-392(d), subject to the reasonable necessities for the prevention of waste.

Whenever the Commission limits the total amount of gas which may be produced from a pool, the Commission shall then allocate or distribute the allowable production among the developed areas in the pool on a reasonable basis, so that each producer will have the opportunity to produce his just and equitable share, as such share is set forth in subsection G.S. 113-392(d), whether the restriction for the pool as a whole is accomplished by order or by the automatic operation of the prohibitory provisions of this law. As far as applicable, the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be followed in allocating any “allowable” of gas for the State.

After the effective date of any rule or order of the Commission fixing the “allowable” production of oil or gas, or both, or condensate, no person shall produce from any well, lease, or property more than the “allowable” production which is fixed, nor shall such amount be produced in a different manner than that which may be authorized.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 14; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1975, c. 19, ss. 37, 38; 1987, c. 827, s. 112; 2012-143, s. 2(e); 2013-365, s. 4.

§ 113-395.
Permits, fees, and notice required for oil and gas activities.

Before any well, in search of oil or gas, shall be drilled, the person desiring to drill the same shall submit an application for a permit to the Department upon such form as the Department may prescribe and shall pay a fee of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for the first well to be drilled on a pad and fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) for each additional well to be drilled on the same pad. The drilling of any well is prohibited unless the Department has issued a permit for the activity.

Any person desiring to use hydraulic fracturing treatments in conjunction with oil and gas operations or activities shall submit an application for a permit to the Department upon such form as the Department may prescribe. The use of hydraulic fracturing treatments is prohibited unless the Department has issued a permit for the activity.

Each abandoned well and each dry hole shall be plugged promptly in the manner and within the time required by rules prescribed by the Commission, and the owner of such well shall give notice, upon such form as the Commission may prescribe, of the abandonment of each dry hole and of the owner’s intention to abandon, and shall pay a fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450.00). No well shall be abandoned until such notice has been given and such fee has been paid.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 113; 2011-276, s. 2; 2012-143, s. 3(c); 2014-4, s. 11.

§ 113-395.1.
Miscellaneous permit requirements.

The Department shall require that all natural gas compressor stations associated with an oil and gas drilling operation be located inside a baffled building.

History.

2014-4, s. 15(a).

§ 113-395.2.
Subsurface injection of waste prohibited.

Disposal of wastes produced in connection with oil and gas exploration, development, and production, and use of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments for that purpose by injection to subsurface or groundwaters of the State by means of wells is prohibited in accordance with

G.S. 143-214.2

.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-214.2

, a violation of subsection (a) of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2014-4, s. 15(a).

Cross References.

As to prohibited waste discharges, generally, see

G.S. 143-214.2

.

§ 113-395.3.
Environmental compliance review requirements for applicants and permit holders.

For purposes of this section, “applicant” means an applicant for a permit and a permit holder and includes the owner or operator of the facility, and if the owner or operator is a business entity, applicant also includes (i) the parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant; (ii) a partner, officer, director, member, or manager of the business entity, parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant; and (iii) any person with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, other than a minority shareholder of a publicly traded corporation who has no involvement in management or control of the corporation or any of its parents, subsidiaries, or affiliates.

The Department shall conduct an environmental compliance review of each applicant for a new permit under this Article. The environmental compliance review shall evaluate the environmental compliance history of the applicant for a period of five years prior to the date of the application and may cover a longer period at the discretion of the Department. The environmental compliance review of an applicant may include consideration of the environmental compliance history of the parents, subsidiaries, or other affiliates of an applicant or parent that is a business entity, including any business entity or joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, and other facilities owned or operated by any of them. The Department shall determine the scope of the review of the environmental compliance history of the applicant, parents, subsidiaries, or other affiliates of the applicant or parent, including any business entity or joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, and of other facilities owned or operated by any of them. An applicant for a permit shall provide environmental compliance history information for each facility, business entity, joint venture, or other undertaking in which any of the persons listed in this subsection is or has been an owner, operator, officer, director, manager, member, or partner, or in which any of the persons listed in this subsection has had a direct or indirect interest as requested by the Department.

The Department shall determine the extent to which the applicant, or a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant or parent, or a joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, has substantially complied with the requirements applicable to any activity in which any of these entities previously engaged and has substantially complied with federal, North Carolina, and other states’ laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment. The Department may deny an application for a permit if the applicant has a history of significant or repeated violations of statutes, rules, orders, or permit terms or conditions for the protection of the environment or for the conservation of natural resources as evidenced by civil penalty assessments, administrative or judicial compliance orders, or criminal penalties.

A permit holder shall notify the Department of any significant change in its environmental compliance history or any significant change in the (i) identity of any person or structure of the business entity that holds the permit for the facility; (ii) identity of any person or structure of the business entity that owns or operates the facility; or (iii) assets of the permit holder, owner, or operator of the facility. The permit holder shall notify the Department within 30 days of a significant change. A change shall be considered significant if it would result in a change in the identity of the permit holder, owner, or operator for purposes of environmental compliance review. Based on its review of the changes, the Department may modify or revoke a permit, or require issuance of a new permit.

History.

2014-4, s. 15(a).

§ 113-395.4.
Seismic or geophysical data collection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no liability for trespass shall arise from activities conducted for the purpose of seismic or geophysical data collection. Provided, however, (i) persons conducting seismic and geophysical data collection may only conduct such activity by undershooting from an off-site location and without physical entry to private land, unless the landowner’s consent for such activity is obtained in writing and (ii) persons conducting seismic or geophysical data collection shall be civilly liable for any physical or property damage determined to be a direct result of their seismic or geophysical data collection activities, whether or not the seismic or geophysical data collection was conducted by undershooting the land at an off-site location or by physical entry to land as permitted by the landowner.

Conduct of seismic or geophysical data collection activities through physical entry to land without a landowner’s written consent shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2014-4, s. 15(a).

§ 113-396.
Wells to be kept under control.

In order to protect further the natural gas fields and oil fields in this State, it is hereby declared to be unlawful for any person to permit negligently any gas or oil well to go wild or to get out of control. The owner of any such well shall, after 24 hours’ written notice by the Department given to him or to the person in possession of such well, make reasonable effort to control such well.

In the event of the failure of the owner of such well within 24 hours after service of the notice above provided for, to control the same, if such can be done within the period, or to begin in good faith upon service of such notice, operations to control such well, or upon failure to prosecute diligently such operations, then the Department shall have the right to take charge of the work of controlling such well, and it shall have the right to proceed, through its own agents or by contract with a responsible contractor, to control the well or otherwise to prevent the escape or loss of gas or oil from such well all at the reasonable expense of the owner of the well. In order to secure to the Department the payment of the reasonable cost and expense of controlling or plugging such well, the Department shall retain the possession of the same and shall be entitled to receive and retain the rents, revenues and income therefrom until the costs and expenses incurred by the Department shall be repaid. When all such costs and expenses have been repaid, the Department shall restore possession of such well to the owner; provided, that in the event the income received by the Department shall not be sufficient to reimburse the Department as provided for in this section, the Department shall have a lien or privilege upon all of the property of the owner of such well, except such as is exempt by law, and the Department shall proceed to enforce such lien or privilege by suit brought in any court of competent jurisdiction, the same as any other civil action, and the judgment so obtained shall be executed in the same manner now provided by law for execution of judgments. Any excess over the amount due the Department which the property seized and sold may bring, after payment of court costs, shall be paid over to the owner of such well.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 16; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86.

§ 113-397.
Hearing in emergency.

If an emergency situation, as defined by the Department, arises under this Article, the Department may conduct a hearing to determine the appropriate course of action after giving any notice it considers practicable. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes does not apply to a hearing under this section. The rules of evidence apply in a hearing under this section.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 17; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 114.

§ 113-398.
Procedure and powers in hearings by Department.

In the exercise and enforcement of its jurisdiction, the said Department is authorized to summon witnesses, administer oaths, make ancillary orders and require the production of records and books for the purpose of examination at any hearing or investigation conducted by it. In connection with the exercise and enforcement of its jurisdiction, the Department shall also have the right and authority to certify as for contempt, to the court of any county having jurisdiction, violations by any person of any of the provisions of this Article or of the rules or orders of the Department, and if it be found by said court that such person has knowingly and willfully violated same, then such person shall be punished as for contempt in the same manner and to the same extent and with like effect as if said contempt had been of an order, judgment or decree of the court to which said certification is made.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 18; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 115.

§ 113-399.
Suits by Department.

The Department may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in the State to enforce, by injunction or another remedy, an order issued or rule adopted by the Department under this Article. The court may enter any judgment or order necessary to enforce an order issued or rule adopted by the Department under this Article.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 19; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 116.

§ 113-400.
Assessing costs of hearings.

The said Department is hereby authorized and directed to tax and assess against the parties involved in any hearing the costs incurred therein.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 20; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86.

§ 113-401.
Party to hearings; review.

The term “party” as used in this Article shall include any person, firm, corporation or association. In proceedings for review of an order or decision of said Department, the Department shall have all rights and privileges granted by this Article to any other party to such proceedings.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 21; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86.

§ 113-402.
Administrative review.

A party who is dissatisfied with a decision or order of the Department under this Article may obtain administrative review of the decision by filing a petition for a contested case hearing under

G.S. 150B-23

within 10 days after the decision or order is made.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 22; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 117.

§ 113-403.
Judicial review.

Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs judicial review of a decision or order made under this Article.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 118.

§§ 113-404,
113-405.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 119.

§ 113-406.
Effect of pendency of judicial review; stay of proceedings.

The filing or pendency of the application for judicial review provided for in this Article shall not in itself stay or suspend the operation of any order or decision of the Department, but, during the pendency of such proceeding the court, in its discretion, may stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of the order or decision of the Department. No order so staying or suspending an order or decision of the Department shall be made by any court of this State otherwise than on five days’ notice and, after a hearing, and if a stay or suspension is allowed the order granting the same shall contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the court and identified by reference thereto, that great or irreparable damage would otherwise result to the petitioner and specifying the nature of the damage.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 26; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 120.

§ 113-407.
Stay bond.

In case the order or decision of the Department is stayed or suspended, the order or judgment of the court shall not become effective until a bond shall have been executed and filed with and approved by the court, payable to the Department, sufficient in amount and security to secure the prompt payment, by the party petitioning for the stay, of all damages caused by the delay in the enforcement of the order or decision of the Department.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 27; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86.

§ 113-408.
Enjoining violation of laws and rules; service of process; application for drilling well to include residence address of applicant.

Whenever it shall appear that any person is violating, or threatening to violate, any statute of this State with respect to the conservation of oil or gas, or both, or any provision of this law, or any rule or order made thereunder by any act done in the operation of any well producing oil or gas, or by omitting any act required to be done thereunder, the Department, through the Attorney General, may bring suit against such person in the superior court in the county in which the well in question is located, to restrain such person or persons from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit the Department may obtain injunctions, prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions, as the facts may warrant, including, when appropriate, an injunction restraining any person from moving or disposing of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, and any or all such commodities may be ordered to be impounded or placed under the control of an agent appointed by the court if, in the judgment of the court, such action is advisable.

If any such defendant cannot be personally served with summons in that county, personal jurisdiction of that defendant in such suit may be obtained by service made on any employee or agent of that defendant working on or about the oil or gas well involved in such suit, and by the Department mailing a copy of the complaint in the action to the defendant at the address of the defendant then recorded with the director of production and conservation.

Each application for the drilling of a well in search of oil or gas in this State shall include the address of the residence of the applicant or each applicant, which address shall be the address of each person involved in accordance with the records of the director of production and conservation, until such address is changed on the records of the Department after written request.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 28; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 121.

§ 113-409.
Punishment for making false entries, etc.

Any person who, for the purpose of evading this law, or of evading any rule or order made thereunder, shall intentionally make or cause to be made any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made by this law or by any rule or order made hereunder; or who, for such purpose, shall make or cause to be made any false entry in any account, record, or memorandum kept by any person in connection with the provisions of this law or of any rule or order made thereunder; or who, for such purpose, shall omit to make, or cause to be omitted, full, true and correct entries in such accounts, records, or memoranda, of all facts and transactions pertaining to the interest or activities in the petroleum industry of such person as may be required by the Department under authority given in this law or by any rule or order made hereunder; or who, for such purpose shall remove out of the jurisdiction of the State, or who shall mutilate, alter, or by any other means falsify, any book, record, or other paper, pertaining to the transactions regulated by this law, or by any rule or order made hereunder, shall be deemed guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 29; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 122; 1993, c. 539, s. 871; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 113-410.
Penalties for other violations.

Any person who fails to secure a permit prior to drilling a well or using hydraulic fracturing treatments, or who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this Article, or any rule or order of the Commission or the Department made hereunder, shall, in the event a penalty for such violation is not otherwise provided for herein, be subject to a penalty of not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) a day for each and every day of such violation, and for each and every act of violation, such penalty to be recovered in a suit in the superior court of the county where the defendant resides, or in the county of the residence of any defendant if there be more than one defendant, or in the superior court of the county where the violation took place. The place of suit shall be selected by the Department, and such suit, by direction of the Department, shall be instituted and conducted in the name of the Department by the Attorney General. The payment of any penalty as provided for herein shall not have the effect of changing illegal oil into legal oil, illegal gas into legal gas, or illegal product into legal product, nor shall such payment have the effect of authorizing the sale or purchase or acquisition, or the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, of such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, but, to the contrary, penalty shall be imposed for each prohibited transaction relating to such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product.

Any person knowingly and willfully aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of any statute of this State relating to the conservation of oil or gas, or the violation of any provisions of this law, or any rule or order made thereunder, shall be subject to the same penalties as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section for the violation by such other person.

In determining the amount of a penalty under this section, the Department shall consider all of the following factors:

The degree and extent of harm to the natural resources of the State, to the public health, or to private property resulting from the violation.

The duration and gravity of the violation.

The effect on ground or surface water quantity or quality or on air quality.

The cost of rectifying the damage.

The amount of money the violator saved by noncompliance.

Whether the violation was committed willfully or intentionally.

The prior record of the violator in complying or failing to comply with this Article or a rule adopted pursuant to this Article.

The cost to the State of the enforcement procedures.

If any civil penalty has not been paid within 60 days after notice of assessment has been served on the violator or within 30 days after service of the final decision by the administrative law judge in accordance with

G.S. 150B-34

, a final decision by the Committee on Civil Penalty Remissions established under G.S. 143B-293.6, or a court order, whichever is later, the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil action in the superior court of any county in which the violator resides or has his or its principal place of business to recover the amount of the civil penalty.

The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 30; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 122; 1998-215, s. 50; 2012-143, s. 2(f).

§ 113-411.
Dealing in or handling of illegal oil, gas or product prohibited.

The sale, purchase or acquisition, or the transportation, refining, processing or handling in any other way of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product is hereby prohibited. All persons purchasing any petroleum product must first be licensed to do so by the Department.

Unless and until the Department provides for certificates of clearance or tenders, or some other method, so that any person may have an opportunity to determine whether any contemplated transaction of sale, purchase or acquisition, or transportation, refining, processing or handling in any other way, involves illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, no penalty shall be imposed for the sale, purchase or acquisition, or the transportation, refining, processing or handling in any other way of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, except under circumstances hereinafter stated. Penalties shall be imposed for the commission of each transaction prohibited in this section when the person committing the same knows that illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product is involved in such transaction, or when such person could have known or determined such fact by the exercise of reasonable diligence or from facts within his knowledge. However, regardless of lack of actual notice or knowledge, penalties as provided in this law shall apply to any sale, purchase or acquisition, and to the transportation, refining, processing or handling in any other way, of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, where administrative provision is made for identifying the character of the commodity as to its legality. It shall likewise be a violation for which penalties shall be imposed for any person to sell, purchase or acquire, or to transport, refine, process or handle in any other way any oil, gas or any product without complying with any rule or order of the Department relating thereto.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 31; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 122.

§ 113-412.
Seizure and sale of contraband oil, gas and product.

Apart from, and in addition to, any other remedy or procedure which may be available to the Department, or any penalty which may be sought against or imposed upon any person with respect to violations relating to illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, all illegal oil, illegal gas and illegal product shall, except under such circumstances as are stated herein, be contraband and shall be seized and sold. Such sale shall not take place unless the court shall find, in the proceeding provided for in this paragraph, that the commodity involved is contraband. Whenever the Department believes that illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product is subject to seizure and sale, as provided herein, it shall, through the Attorney General, have issued a warrant of attachment and bring a civil action in rem for that purpose in the superior court of the county where the commodity is found, or the action may be maintained in connection with any suit or cross bill for injunction or for penalty relating to any prohibited transaction involving such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product. Any interested person who may show himself to be adversely affected by any such seizure and sale shall have the right to intervene in such suit to protect his rights.

The action referred to above shall be strictly in rem and shall proceed in the name of the State as plaintiff against the illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product mentioned in the complaint, as defendant, and no bond or bonds shall be required of the plaintiff in connection therewith. Upon the filing of the complaint, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county, or to such other officer or person as the court may authorize to serve process, requiring him to summon any and all persons (without undertaking to name them) who may be interested in the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product mentioned in the complaint to appear and answer within 30 days after the issuance and service of such summons. The summons shall contain the style and number of the suit and a very brief statement of the nature of the cause of action. It shall be served by posting one copy thereof at the courthouse door of the county where the commodity involved in the suit is alleged to be located and by posting another copy thereof near the place where the commodity is alleged to be located. Copy of such summons shall be posted at least five days before the return day stated therein, and the posting of such copy shall constitute constructive possession of such commodity by the State. A copy of the summons shall also be published once each week for four weeks in some newspaper published in the county where the suit is pending and having a bona fide circulation therein. No judgment shall be pronounced by any court condemning such commodity as contraband until after the lapse of five days from the last publication of said summons. Proof of service of said summons, and the manner thereof, shall be as provided by general law.

Where it appears by a verified pleading on the part of the plaintiff, or by affidavit, or affidavits, or by oral testimony, that grounds for the seizure and sale exist, the clerk, in addition to the summons or warning order, shall issue a warrant of attachment, which shall be signed by the clerk and bear the seal of the court. Such warrant of attachment shall specifically describe the illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, so that the same may be identified with reasonable certainty. It shall direct the sheriff to whom it is addressed to take into his custody, actual or constructive, the illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, described therein, and to hold the same subject to the orders of the court. Said warrant of attachment shall be executed as a writ of attachment is executed. No bond shall be required before the issuance of such warrant of attachment, and the sheriff shall be responsible upon his official bond for the proper execution thereof.

In a proper case, the court may direct the sheriff to deliver the custody of any illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product seized by him under a warrant of attachment, to a commissioner to be appointed by the court, which commissioner shall act as the agent of the court and shall give bond with such approved surety as the court may direct, conditioned that he will faithfully conserve such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product, as may come into his custody and possession in accordance with the orders of the court; provided, that the court may in its discretion appoint any member of the Department or any agent of the Department as such commissioner of the court.

Sales of illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product seized under the authority of this law, and notices of such sales, shall be in accordance with the laws of this State relating to the sale and disposition of attached property; provided, however, that where the property is in custody of a commissioner of the court, the sale shall be held by said commissioner and not by the sheriff. For his services hereunder, such commissioner shall receive a reasonable fee to be paid out of the proceeds of the sale or sales to be fixed by the court ordering such sale.

The court may order that the commodity be sold in specified lots or portions, and at specified intervals, instead of being sold at one time. Title to the amount sold shall pass as of the date of the law which is found by the court to make the commodity contraband. The judgment shall provide for the clear proceeds of the sales to be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

. The amount sold shall be treated as legal oil, legal gas or legal product, as the case may be, in the hands of the purchaser, but the purchaser and the commodity shall be subject to all applicable laws, rules, and orders with respect to further sale or purchase or acquisition, and with respect to the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way, of the commodity purchased.

Nothing in this section shall deny or abridge any cause of action a royalty owner, or a lienholder, or any other claimant, may have, because of the forfeiture of the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, against the person whose act resulted in such forfeiture. No illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product shall be sold for less than the average market value at the time of sale of similar products of like grade and character.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 32; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 123; 1998-215, s. 51.